Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.090

Required action plans—Implementation—Technical assistance and funds—Progress report.

A school district must implement a required action plan upon approval by the state board of education. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the required action district with technical assistance and federal or state funds for school improvement, if available, to implement an approved plan. The district must submit a report to the superintendent of public instruction that provides the progress the district is making in meeting the student achievement goals based on the state's assessments, identifying strategies and assets used to solve audit findings, and establishing evidence of meeting plan implementation benchmarks as set forth in the required action plan.

[ 2013 c 159 s 9; 2010 c 235 s 109.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.